Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
State Child Sexual Abuse and Exploitation Prevention Board

15.900.
Definitions for KRS 15.900 to 15.940.

As used in KRS

15.900

to

15.940

:

“Abused or neglected child” has the same meaning as in KRS

600.020

;

“Child” means a person under eighteen (18) years of age;

“Child sexual abuse and exploitation” means harm to a child’s health or welfare by any person, responsible or not for the child’s health or welfare, which harm occurs or is threatened through nonaccidental sexual contact which includes violations of KRS

510.040

to

510.150

,

530.020

,

530.070

,

531.310

,

531.320

, and

531.370

;

“Community resource organization” means an organization which meets the criteria described in KRS

15.940

;

“State board” means the State Child Abuse and Neglect Prevention Board created in KRS

15.905

;

“Prevention program” means a system of direct provision of child sexual abuse and exploitation or child abuse and neglect prevention services to a child, parent, or guardian, but shall not include research programs related to prevention of child sexual abuse and exploitation or child abuse and neglect; and

“Trust fund” means the child victims’ trust fund established in the Office of the State Treasurer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 382, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 2022 ch. 75, § 1, effective April 1, 2022.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Armstrong & Gillig, Responding to Child Sexual Abuse and Exploitation: The Kentucky Approach, 16 N. Ky. L. Rev. 17 (1988).

15.905.
State Child Abuse and Neglect Prevention Board.

The State Child Abuse and Neglect Prevention Board is created as an autonomous agency within the Office of the Attorney General.

The state board may appoint an executive director of the state board to exercise the powers and carry out the duties of the state board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 382, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 2022 ch. 75, § 2, effective April 1, 2022.

15.910.
Members of board — Terms — Chairperson — Expenses — Voting.

The state board shall be composed of the following fifteen (15) members:

The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or designee;

The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet or designee;

The secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet or designee;

The commissioner of the Department of Kentucky State Police or designee; and

The Attorney General or designee;

Eight (8) public members from each of the following organizations:

The executive director of the Kentucky Youth Advocates or designee;

The executive director of the Prevent Child Abuse Kentucky or designee;

The state director of the Kentucky Court Appointed Special Advocates Network, Inc. or designee;

The executive director of the Children’s Advocacy Centers of Kentucky or designee;

The president of the Children’s Alliance or designee;

The executive director of the Kentucky Chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics or designee;

The executive director of the Kentucky Association of Regional Programs or designee; and

The director of the Kentucky Administrative Office of the Courts or designee; and

Two (2) nonvoting liaisons who are members of the General Assembly, one (1) of whom shall be a member of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and one (1) of whom shall be a member of the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate.

The Attorney General shall serve as chairperson or designate a chairperson of the state board in which case the chairperson shall serve in that position at the pleasure of the Attorney General. The state board may elect other officers and committees as it considers appropriate.

There shall be no per diem compensation; however, the schedule for reimbursement of expenses for the public members of the state board shall be the same as for state employees. The reimbursement, executive director and staff salaries, and all actual and necessary operating expenses of the state board shall be paid from the trust fund, pursuant to an authorization as provided in KRS

15.935

.

A majority of the entire membership of the state board, excluding nonvoting liaison members, shall constitute a quorum, and all actions of the state board shall be by vote of a majority of its entire membership, excluding nonvoting liaison members.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 382, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 27, § 1, effective March 2, 1992; 1998, ch. 426, § 67, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 83, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 34, effective June 26, 2007; 2022 ch. 75, § 3, effective April 1, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/1/2022). 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 236 merged the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet into the newly created Education and Labor Cabinet. A change has been made in the text of this statute to conform to that name change.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Armstrong & Gillig, Responding to Child Sexual Abuse and Exploitation: The Kentucky Approach, 16 N. Ky. L. Rev. 17 (1988).

15.915.
Public meetings and records.

The business which the state performs shall be conducted at a public meeting of the state board held in compliance with the Open Meetings Act.

A writing prepared, owned, used, in the possession of, or retained by the state board of the performance in an official function shall be made available to the public in compliance with the Open Records Act.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 382, § 4, effective July 13, 1984.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross References.

Open Meetings Act, KRS

61.805

to

61.850

.

Open Records Act, KRS

61.870

to

61.884

.

15.920.
Duties of board.

The state board shall do all of the following:

Meet not less than quarterly at the call of the chairperson;

One (1) year after the original appointment of the state board, and biennially thereafter, develop a state plan for the distribution of funds from the trust fund. In developing the plan, the state board shall review already existing prevention programs. The plan shall assure that an equal opportunity exists for establishment of prevention programs and receipt of trust fund money among all geographic areas in this state. The plan shall be transmitted to the clerk of the House of Representatives, to the clerk of the Senate, and to the Governor;

Provide for the coordination and exchange of information on the establishment and maintenance of prevention programs;

Develop and publicize criteria for the receipt of trust fund money by eligible community resource organizations and eligible prevention programs;

Review, approve, and monitor the expenditure of trust fund money by community resource organizations and prevention programs;

Provide statewide educational and public informational seminars for the purpose of developing appropriate public awareness regarding the prevention of child sexual abuse and exploitation and child abuse and neglect; encourage professional persons and groups to recognize and deal with prevention of child sexual abuse and exploitation and child abuse and neglect; encourage and coordinate the development of community resource organizations; make information about the prevention of child sexual abuse and exploitation and child abuse and neglect available to the public and organizations and agencies which deal with problems of child sexual abuse and exploitation and child abuse and neglect; and encourage the development of community prevention programs; and

Establish a procedure for an annual, internal evaluation of the functions, responsibilities, and performance of the state board. In a year in which the biennial state plan is prepared, the evaluation shall be coordinated with the preparation of the state plan.

The state board may enter into contracts with public or private agencies to fulfill the requirements of this section. The state board shall utilize existing state resources and staff of participating departments whenever practicable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 382, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 2022 ch. 75, § 4, effective April 1, 2022.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Armstrong & Gillig, Responding to Child Sexual Abuse and Exploitation: The Kentucky Approach, 16 N. Ky. L. Rev. 17 (1988).

15.925.
Report of board.

The state board shall by December 1 of each year report to the Governor and the General Assembly recommending changes in state programs, statutes, policies, budgets, and standards that will reduce the problem of child sexual abuse and exploitation and child abuse and neglect, improve coordination among government and private agencies that provide prevention services and improve the condition of children and parents or guardians who are in need of prevention program services.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 382, § 6, effective July 13, 1984; 2022 ch. 75, § 5, effective April 1, 2022.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Armstrong & Gillig, Responding to Child Sexual Abuse and Exploitation: The Kentucky Approach, 16 N. Ky. L. Rev. 17 (1988).

15.930.
Use of funds.

The state board may accept federal funds granted by the Congress or executive order for the purposes of KRS

15.900

to

15.940

as well as gifts and donations from individuals, private organizations, or foundations. All funds received in the manner described in this section shall be transmitted to the State Treasurer for deposit in the trust fund, and shall be made available for expenditure as appropriated by the General Assembly.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 382, § 7, effective July 13, 1984.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Armstrong & Gillig, Responding to Child Sexual Abuse and Exploitation: The Kentucky Approach, 16 N. Ky. L. Rev. 17 (1988).

15.935.
Purposes for disbursement of funds.

The state board may authorize the disbursement of available money from the trust fund, upon legislative appropriations, for exclusively the following purposes, which are listed in the order of preference for expenditure:

To fund a private nonprofit or public organization in the development or operation of a prevention program if at least all of the following conditions are met:

The appropriate community resource organization has reviewed and approved the program. This subparagraph does not apply if a community resource organization does not exist for the geographic area to be served by the program;

The organization agrees to match a percentage, as determined by the state board, of the total cost of the project through dollars as a match;

The organization demonstrates a willingness and ability to provide program models and consultation to organizations and communities regarding program development and maintenance; and

Other conditions that the state board may deem appropriate;

To fund the cost of medical examinations of victims of suspected child sexual abuse and child abuse and neglect to the extent the fee for an examination is a service not eligible to be paid for by Medicaid or private insurance. The fees paid for this examination shall not exceed reasonable, usual, and customary charges as set by the state board;

To fund the cost of counseling and other mental health services to victims of child sexual abuse and child abuse and neglect to the extent the fees for counseling and mental health services are services not eligible to be paid for by Medicaid or private insurance. The fees paid for counseling and mental health services shall not exceed reasonable, usual, and customary charges as set by the state board;

To fund community resource organizations;

To fund a statewide public education and awareness campaign on child sexual abuse and child abuse and neglect, making use of electronic and print media to inform the public about the nature of child sexual abuse and child abuse and neglect, legal reporting requirements, victim rights, legal remedies, agency services, and prevention strategies;

To fund and evaluate the comparative success of statewide comprehensive approaches to prevention education making use of multiple approaches; and

To fund the state board created in KRS

15.905

for the actual and necessary operating expenses that the board incurs in performing its duties.

Authorizations for disbursement of trust fund money under subsection (1)(g) of this section shall be kept at a minimum in furtherance of the primary purpose of the trust fund which is to disburse money under subsections (1)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this section to encourage the direct provision of services to prevent child abuse and exploitation and child abuse and neglect, and to provide medical examination and counseling or other mental health services for victims of child sexual abuse and child abuse and neglect.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 382, § 8, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 113, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 366, § 11, effective July 15, 1996; 2022 ch. 75, § 6, effective April 1, 2022.

15.940.
Criteria for making grants to community resource organizations — Administration by cabinet.

In making grants to a community resource organization, the state board shall consider the degree to which the community resource organization meets the following criteria:

Has as its primary purpose the development and facilitation of a collaborative community prevention program in a specific geographical area. The prevention program shall utilize trained volunteers and existing community resources wherever practicable;

Is comprised of local law enforcement and social services representatives and does not exclude any organization or person that the state board deems necessary;

Demonstrates a willingness and ability to provide prevention program models and consultation to organizations and communities regarding prevention program development and maintenance;

Agrees to match fifty percent (50%) of the amount requested from the trust fund. At least ten percent (10%) of the amount requested shall be matched through dollars, and the remaining match shall be through in-kind contributions. The amount and types of in-kind services are subject to the approval of the state board; and

Other criteria that the state board deems appropriate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 382, § 9, effective July 13, 1984; 1996, ch. 366, § 10, effective July 15, 1996; 2022 ch. 75, § 7, effective April 1, 2022.

15.942.
Training plan for child sexual abuse and child abuse and neglect cases.

The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, the Attorney General, the Administrative Office of the Courts, and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall develop a training plan for investigation of child sexual abuse and child abuse and neglect cases and protection of child sexual abuse and child abuse and neglect victims within the Commonwealth. They may seek assistance from any educational, legal, and mental and physical health-care professionals or child welfare organizations needed for implementation of training programs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 351, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 426, § 68, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 84, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 35, effective June 26, 2007; 2022 ch. 75, § 8, effective April 1, 2022.

15.944.
Repealed, 2000.

15.946.
In-service training for peace officers on child sexual abuse.

The Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall provide an in-service training program for peace officers in child development, the dynamics of physical and sexual abuse, the impact of violence on child development, the treatment of offenders, and related issues. Each peace officer desiring to participate in the Kentucky Law Enforcement Foundation Fund program, if eligible to participate, shall successfully complete the in-service training.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 351, § 4, effective July 14, 1992.

15.948.
Attorney General to have staff available specially trained in child sexual abuse and child abuse and neglect — Assistance to prosecutors.

The Attorney General shall have staff available who are specially trained in child sexual abuse and child abuse and neglect. Commonwealth’s attorneys and county attorneys may request assistance in the investigation and prosecution of child sexual abuse and child abuse and neglect cases in accordance with provisions of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 351, § 10, effective July 14, 1992; 2022 ch. 75, § 9, effective April 1, 2022.